Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.130

Exemptions.

This chapter does not prohibit or regulate:

(1) The practice of physical therapy by students enrolled in approved schools as may be incidental to their course of study so long as such activities do not go beyond the scope of practice defined by this chapter.

(2) Auxiliary services provided by physical therapy aides carrying out duties necessary for the support of physical therapy including those duties which involve minor physical therapy services when performed under the direct supervision of licensed physical therapists so long as such activities do not go beyond the scope of practice defined by this chapter.

(3) The practice of physical therapy by licensed or registered physical therapists of other states or countries while appearing as clinicians of bona fide educational seminars sponsored by physical therapy, medical, or other healing art professional associations so long as such activities do not go beyond the scope of practice defined by this chapter.

(4) The practice of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants in the armed services or employed by any other branch of the federal government.

[ 2007 c 98 s 12; 1983 c 116 s 22.]